Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.200

Limitation of actions.

The limitations prescribed in chapter 4.16 RCW shall apply to actions brought in the name or for the benefit of, or against, a code city, except as otherwise provided by general law or by this title.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.200.]